Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska43-3714
Confidentiality; violation; penalty.

The contents of any document, record, or other information relating to a case to which the court appointed special advocate volunteer has access are confidential, and the volunteer shall not disclose such information to persons other than the court, the parties to the action, and other persons authorized by the court. A violation of this section is a Class III misdemeanor.

Laws 2000, LB 1167, § 37.